District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.04

Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into classes, the articles may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the holders of one or more authorized classes of shares. A class or classes of shares entitled to elect one or more directors shall be a separate voting group for the purposes of the election of directors.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720